Hawaii statutes.
[§187A-3.5] Aquaculturist license and
license to sell prohibited aquatic life. (a) Notwithstanding the
provisions in subtitle 5 of title 12, or administrative rules adopted
thereunder, the department may issue to any qualified aquaculturist a license to
fish, possess, rear, and sell any aquatic life whose fishing, possession or
sale is prohibited by closed season, minimum size, or bag limit; provided that
the qualified aquaculturist rears or reared the aquatic life in an aquaculture
facility.

(b) The department may further issue to any
person a license to possess or sell or offer for sale any aquatic life whose
possession or sale is prohibited by a closed season, minimum size, or bag
limit; provided that the aquatic life was reared by a licensed qualified
aquaculturist in an aquaculture facility pursuant to subsection (a).

(c) The department may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91, to implement this section by establishing the licenses, fees, and
terms or conditions necessary for the fishing, possession, or sale of aquatic
life whose fishing, possession, or sale is prohibited by closed season, minimum
size, or bag limit. [L 1995, c 111, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next